Hawaii statutes.
[§143-2.6] Animal desertion. It
shall be unlawful for the owner of any animal or any person in possession of an
animal that belongs to another person to leave the animal without the intention
of returning to it.

Any person who violates this section shall be
guilty of a petty misdemeanor. [L 1992, c 223, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next